New York, session 2025-2026, S5055.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 1 of section 66-p of the 2 public service law, as amended by section 3 of part QQ of chapter 56 of 3 the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 4 (b) "renewable energy systems" means systems that generate electricity 5 or thermal energy through use of the following technologies: solar ther- 6 mal, photovoltaics, on land and offshore wind, hydroelectric, geothermal 7 electric, geothermal ground source heat, tidal energy, wave energy, 8 ocean thermal, [and] fuel cells which do not utilize a fossil fuel 9 resource in the process of generating electricity, and fuel-flexible 10 linear generators which do not utilize a fossil fuel resource in the 11 process of generating electricity. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00260-01-5